es: Configuración de los micrófonos y el preamplificador: Ninguna (acústica); Solo pastilla (pasiva); Pastilla con preamplificador integrado (activa); Otra
nl: Pickup- en voorversterkerconfiguratie: Geen (akoestisch); Alleen pick-up (passief); Pick-up met ingebouwde voorversterker (actief); Overige
th: การรับและการกำหนดค่าปรีแอมป์: ไม่มี (อะคูสติก); ปิกอัปอย่างเดียว (พาสซีฟ); ปิกอัปพร้อมปรีแอมป์ในตัว (แอคทีฟ); อื่นๆ
vi: Cấu hình pickup và tiền khuếch đại: Không có (acoustic); Chỉ pickup (thụ động); Pickup có preamp tích hợp (chủ động); Khác
en: Pickup and preamp configuration: None (acoustic); Pickup only (passive); Pickup with built-in preamp (active); Other
ja: 受信とプリアンプの構成: なし (アコースティック); ピックアップのみ (パッシブ); プリアンプ内蔵ピックアップ (アクティブ); その他
zh-TW: 拾音器與前級擴大機配置: 無 (原聲); 僅拾音器 (被動式); 拾音器內建前級 (主動式); 其他
zh-CN: 拾音器与前置放大器配置: 无（原声）; 仅拾音器（无源）; 带内置前级放大器的拾音器（有源）; 其他
ro-RO: Configurația pickup-ului și a preamplificatorului: Fără (acustică); Doar doză (pasivă); Doză cu preamplificator încorporat (activă); Altele
sv: Pickup- och förförstärkarkonfiguration: Ingen (akustisk); Endast pickup (passiv); Pickup med inbyggd förförstärkare (aktiv); Övrigt
it: Configurazione del pickup e del preamplificatore: Nessuna (acustica); Solo pickup (passiva); Pickup con preamplificatore integrato (attiva); Altro
da: Konfiguration af pickup og forforstærker: Ingen (akustisk); Kun pickup (passiv); Pickup med indbygget forforstærker (aktiv); Andet
hu: Hangszedő és előerősítő konfigurációja: Nincs (akusztikus); Csak hangszedő (passzív); Hangszedő beépített előerősítővel (aktív); Egyéb
ru: Конфигурация звукоснимателя и предусилителя: Нет (акустическая); Только звукосниматель (пассивная); Звукосниматель со встроенным предусилителем (активная); Другое
fi: Mikrofonien ja esivahvistimen kokoonpano: Ei mitään (akustinen); Vain mikrofoni (passiivinen); Mikrofoni ja sisäänrakennettu esivahvistin (aktiivinen); Muu
ko: 픽업 및 프리앰프 구성: 없음(어쿠스틱); 픽업만(패시브); 내장형 프리앰프가 있는 픽업(액티브); 기타
pt-PT: recolha e configuração do pré-amplificador: Nenhuma (acústica); Apenas captador (passivo); Captador com pré-amplificador integrado (ativo); Outra
bg-BG: Конфигурация на адаптер и предусилвател: Няма (акустичен); Само адаптер (пасивен); Адаптер с вграден предусилвател (активен); Друга
nb: Konfigurasjon for pickup og forforsterker: Ingen (akustisk); Kun pickup (passiv); Pickup med innebygd forforsterker (aktiv); Annet
tr: Manyetik ve preamp yapılandırması: Yok (akustik); Sadece manyetik (pasif); Dahili preamplili manyetik (aktif); Diğer
hr-HR: Preuzimanje i konfiguracija predpojačala: Nema (akustično); Samo pickup (pasivno); Pickup s ugrađenim pretpojačalom (aktivno); Ostalo
sl-SI: Konfiguracija odjemnika zvoka in predoječevalnika: Brez (akustično); Samo magnet (pasivno); Magnet z vgrajenim predojačevalnikom (aktivno); Drugo
lt-LT: Garso nuėmiklio ir priešstiprintuvo konfigūracija: Nėra (akustinis); Tik garso nuėmėjas (pasyvus); Garso nuėmėjas su integruotu stiprintuvu (aktyvus); Kita
fr: Configuration du micro et du préampli: Aucun (acoustique); Micro seul (passif); Micro avec préampli intégré (actif); Autre
de: Tonabnehmer- und Vorverstärkerkonfiguration: Keine (akustisch); Nur Tonabnehmer (passiv); Tonabnehmer mit integriertem Vorverstärker (aktiv); Andere
pt-BR: Captador e pré-amplificador configuração: Nenhum (acústico); Apenas captador (passivo); Captador com pré-amplificador integrado (ativo); Outros
sk-SK: Konfigurácia snímača a predzosilňovača: Žiadna (akustická); Iba snímač (pasívny); Snímač so vstavaným predzosilňovačom (aktívny); Iné
pl: Konfiguracja przetwornika i przedwzmacniacza: Brak (instrument akustyczny); Tylko przetwornik (pasywny); Przetwornik z wbudowanym przedwzmacniaczem (aktywny); Inna
el: παραλαβή and preamp configuration: Κανένα (ακουστικό); Μόνο μαγνήτης (παθητικός); Μαγνήτης με ενσωματωμένο προενισχυτή (ενεργός); Άλλο
cs: Konfigurace snímače a předzesilovače: Žádné (akustické); Pouze snímač (pasivní); Snímač s vestavěným předzesilovačem (aktivní); Ostatní